Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.520

Property transactions, restrictive conveyances, highway purpose—Existing law to continue.

Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted as changing existing law with respect to:

(1) Property given to a state agency on restrictive conveyance with provision for reversion to the grantor or for the vesting of title in another if and when such property is not used by the agency concerned for the stipulated purposes;

(2) Land or other property acquired by any state agency for highway purposes.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.30.250. Prior: 1957 c 38 s 25. Formerly RCW 43.30.250.]